New York, session 2025-2026, S9209.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The labor law is amended by adding a new section 211-b to 2 read as follows: 3 § 211-b. Job posting advertisements; vacancy disclosure. 1. Every 4 employer who publicly advertises a job posting shall include in the 5 posting a statement disclosing whether the posting is for an existing 6 vacancy or not. The statement shall be clear, conspicuous, and written 7 in a legible font. 8 2. The commissioner shall have authority to enforce this section. When 9 the commissioner determines that an employer is violating or has 10 violated this section, the commissioner may issue an order to such 11 employer to pay an administrative fine, to cease and desist from violat- 12 ing the section, or both. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14071-01-5